Washington statutes.
RCW 39.59.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Bond" means any agreement which may or may not be represented by a physical instrument, including but not limited to bonds, notes, warrants, or certificates of indebtedness, that evidences an obligation under which the issuer agrees to pay a specified amount of money, with or without interest, at a designated time or times either to registered owners or bearers.

(2) "Local government" means any county, city, town, special purpose district, political subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation, including any public corporation, authority, or other instrumentality created by such an entity.

(3) "State" includes any state in the United States, other than the state of Washington.

[ 2016 c 152 s 9; 2015 c 225 s 50; 2002 c 332 s 22; 1988 c 281 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 332: See notes following RCW 43.19.760.